Connecticut, session 2026, SB00488.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 3-56a of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July
1, 2026):
As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Apparent owner" means the person whose name appears on the
records of the holder as the person entitled to the property held, issued
or owing by the holder, except for purposes of subdivision (8) of this
section, "apparent owner" includes an agent or other representative of
the apparent owner, but excludes the holder acting as the apparent
owner's agent;
(2) "Banking organization" means any state bank and trust company,
national banking association or savings bank engaged in business in this
state;
(3) "Business association" means a corporation, joint stock company,
partnership, unincorporated association, joint venture, limited liability

Substitute Senate Bill No. 488
company, business trust, trust company, safe deposit company,
financial organization, insurance company, person engaged in the
business of operating or controlling a mutual fund, utility or other
business entity consisting of one or more persons, whether or not for
profit;
(4) "Financial organization" means any savings and loan association,
credit union or investment company;
(5) "Funeral service contract" has the same meaning as provided in
section 42-200;
(6) "Gift certificate" means a record evidencing a promise, made for
consideration, by the seller or issuer of the record that goods or services
will be provided to the owner of the record to the value shown in the
record and includes, but is not limited to, a record that contains a
microprocessor chip, magnetic stripe or other means for the storage of
information that is prefunded and for which the value is decremented
upon each use, a gift card, an electronic gift card, stored-value card or
certificate, a store card, or a similar record or card, but "gift certificate"
does not include prepaid calling cards regulated under section 42-370,
prepaid commercial mobile radio services, as defined in 47 CFR 20.3 or
general-use prepaid cards, as defined in section 42-460a;
(7) "Holder" means any person in possession of property subject to
this part which belongs to another, or who is trustee in case of a trust, or
who is indebted to another on an obligation subject to this part;
(8) "Indicated an interest" includes, in addition to other means set
forth in this chapter, the following actions: (A) A record communicated
by the apparent owner to the holder or an agent of the holder concerning
the property or the account in which the property is held, (B) an oral
communication by the apparent owner to the holder or agent of the
holder concerning the property or the account in which the property is
Public Act No. 26-94 2 of 21

Substitute Senate Bill No. 488
held, where such holder or agent contemporaneously makes and
preserves a record of such communication, (C) presentment of a check
or other instrument of payment of a dividend, interest payment or other
distribution by the apparent owner, (D) activity directed by an apparent
owner in the account in which the property is held, including, but not
limited to, accessing the account or information concerning the account,
or a direction by the apparent owner to increase, decrease or otherwise
change the amount or type of property held in the account, (E) activity
directed by an apparent owner in any other account at a business
association, banking organization or financial organization that is the
holder or an agent of the holder of the account in which the property is
held by the apparent owner, including, but not limited to, (i) a deposit
into or withdrawal from such other account, except for an automatic
deposit or withdrawal previously authorized by the apparent owner or
an automatic reinvestment of dividends or interest, (ii) presentment of
a passbook or other similar evidence of a deposit into such other account
for the crediting of interest, or (iii) making a payment to such business
association, banking organization or financial organization for the
principal or interest due on a loan made by such business association,
banking organization or financial organization to the apparent owner,
and (F) any other action by the apparent owner that reasonably
demonstrates to the holder that the apparent owner knows the property
exists. "Indicated an interest" excludes any communication of an
apparent owner with a person other than the holder or the holder's
representative unless a record of the communication evidences the
apparent owner's knowledge of a right to the property;
[(8)] (9) "Insurance company" means an association, corporation or
fraternal or mutual benefit organization, whether or not for profit,
engaged in the business of providing life endowments, annuities or
insurance, including accident, burial, casualty, credit life, contract
performance, dental, disability, fidelity, fire, health, hospitalization,
illness, life, malpractice, marine, mortgage, surety, wage protection and
Public Act No. 26-94 3 of 21

Substitute Senate Bill No. 488
workers' compensation insurance;
[(9)] (10) "Last-known address" means any description, code or other
indication of the location of the apparent owner that identifies the state,
even if such description, code or indication is insufficient for the
purpose of the delivery of first-class United States mail to the apparent
owner;
[(10)] (11) "Mineral" means gas; oil; other gaseous, liquid and solid
hydrocarbons; oil shale; cement material; sand and gravel; road
material; building stone; chemical raw material; gemstone; fissionable
and nonfissionable ores; colloidal and other clay; steam and other
geothermal resource; or any other substance defined as a mineral by the
law of this state;
[(11)] (12) "Mineral proceeds" means amounts payable for the
extraction, production or sale of minerals, or, upon the abandonment of
those payments, all payments that become payable thereafter, and
"mineral proceeds" includes amounts payable: (A) For the acquisition
and retention of a mineral lease, including bonuses, royalties,
compensatory royalties, shut-in royalties, minimum royalties and delay
rentals; (B) for the extraction, production or sale of minerals, including
net revenue interests, royalties, overriding royalties, extraction
payments and production payments; and (C) under an agreement or
option, including a joint operating agreement, unit agreement, pooling
agreement and farm-out agreement;
[(12)] (13) "Owner" means a depositor in case of a deposit, a
beneficiary in case of a trust, a creditor, claimant or payee in case of other
choses in action, or any person having a legal or equitable interest in
property subject to this part, or such person's legal representative;
[(13)] (14) "Person" means any individual, business association,
estate, trust, government, governmental subdivision, agency or
Public Act No. 26-94 4 of 21

Substitute Senate Bill No. 488
instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity;
[(14)] (15) "Property" means realty or personalty, tangible or
intangible, and includes, but is not limited to, virtual currency;
[(15)] (16) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible
medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is
retrievable in perceivable form;
[(16)] (17) "Treasurer" means the Treasurer of the state of Connecticut;
[(17)] (18) "Utility" means a person who owns or operates for public
use any plant, equipment, real property, franchise or license for the
transmission of communications or the production, storage,
transmission, sale, delivery or furnishing of electricity, water, steam or
gas; and
[(18)] (19) "Virtual currency" has the same meaning as provided in
section 36a-596.
Sec. 2. Section 3-58a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) Unclaimed funds held and owing by an insurance company shall
be presumed abandoned if a person other than the insured or annuitant
is entitled to the funds and no address of such person is known to the
company. If it is not definite and certain from the records of the
company what person is entitled to the funds, it is presumed that the
last-known address of the person entitled to the funds is the same as the
last-known address of the insured or annuitant according to the records
of the company.
(b) As used in this section, "unclaimed funds" means all moneys held
and owing by any insurance company unclaimed and unpaid for more
than three years after the moneys became due and payable as
Public Act No. 26-94 5 of 21

Substitute Senate Bill No. 488
established from the records of a life insurance company under any life
or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract which has matured
or terminated or after the moneys became due and payable as
established from the records of any other insurance company. A life
insurance policy not matured by actual proof of the death of the insured
is deemed to be matured and the proceeds thereof are deemed to be due
and payable if such policy was in force when the insured attained the
limiting age under the mortality table on which the reserve is based,
unless the person appearing entitled thereto has within the preceding
three years (1) assigned, readjusted or paid premiums on the policy, or
subjected the policy to loan, or (2) corresponded in writing with the
insurance company concerning the policy. Moneys otherwise payable
according to the records of the company are deemed due and payable
although the policy or contract has not been surrendered as required.
The application of an automatic premium loan provision or other
nonforfeiture provision contained in an insurance policy does not
prevent the policy from being deemed matured or terminated for
purposes of this section if the insured has died or the insured or a
beneficiary of the policy have otherwise become entitled to the proceeds
thereof before the depletion of the cash surrender value of a policy
subject to such provisions.
Sec. 3. Subsection (c) of section 3-61b of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(c) Not later than March first of each year, the holder shall obtain from
the funeral service establishment a list of all properties held by such
holder pursuant to a funeral service contract that meets any of the
following: (1) [that] The funeral service contract was entered into
seventy-five years or more ago, (2) [for which] the funeral service
establishment has received affirmative notification of the death of the
beneficiary of such contract, or (3) [for which] the beneficiary of such
Public Act No. 26-94 6 of 21

Substitute Senate Bill No. 488
contract has reached the age of one hundred ten years.
Sec. 4. Section 3-65a of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(a) Between July first and September thirtieth, inclusive, of the
calendar year in which a presumption of abandonment is to take effect,
if the owner's claim is not barred by law, the holder shall notify the
owner thereof and take reasonable steps to prevent abandonment from
being presumed. Such notice shall be provided, at a minimum, by (1)
first-class mail directed to the owner's last-known address, if such
address is sufficient for the purpose of the delivery of first-class United
States mail and the cumulative value of all property belonging to the
owner is fifty dollars or greater, and (2) electronic mail directed to the
owner's last-known electronic mail address, regardless of the value of
the property, if a holder has received an owner's consent for the
electronic delivery of any notices that are required by law. Such notice
shall inform the owner that evidence of interest must be indicated as
required by this part or such property will be transferred to the
Treasurer and will be subject to escheat to the state. If the property
presumed abandoned is a security, virtual currency or tangible property
from a safe deposit box, the holder's notice shall indicate that such
property may be liquidated either prior to or following its reporting to
the Treasurer and that after such liquidation will be limited to the
proceeds of such liquidation. Nothing in this subsection shall be
construed to require an owner to consent to the electronic delivery of
notices for communications regarding unclaimed property.
(b) Not later than March thirty-first following the close of the
calendar year in which property is presumed abandoned, the holder
shall pay or deliver such property to the Treasurer and file, on forms
that the Treasurer shall provide, a report of unclaimed property. Each
report shall be verified and shall include: (1) The name, if known, last-
Public Act No. 26-94 7 of 21

Substitute Senate Bill No. 488
known physical and electronic mail address, if any, and last-known
telephone number, if any, of each person appearing to be the owner of
such property; (2) in case of unclaimed funds of an insurance company,
the full name of the insured or annuitant and beneficiary and his or her
last-known address appearing on the insurance company's records; (3)
the nature and identifying number, if any, or description of the property
and the amount appearing from the records to be due; (4) the date when
the property became payable, demandable or returnable and the date of
the last transaction with the owner with respect to the property; (5) if
the holder is a successor to other holders, or if the holder has changed
the holder's name, all prior known names and addresses of each holder
of the property; and (6) such other information as the Treasurer may
require.
(c) A holder may submit a request to the Treasurer to report and
deliver property prior to the period required under subsection (b) of this
section if the holder has identified circumstances that make it likely such
property will become abandoned and subject to the custody of the state
under this chapter, notwithstanding the passage of time and provision
of notice. Any such request shall include an affidavit by a duly
authorized officer of the holder describing the efforts made to provide
notice to the rightful owner, affirming that such notice was completed
at least six months prior to the date of the affidavit, and that the holder
has not received a communication from the owner that indicated an
interest in such property. The Treasurer may, in the Treasurer's
discretion, consent in writing to such request for early reporting and
delivery.
[(c)] (d) Verification, if made by a partnership, shall be executed by a
partner; if made by an unincorporated association or private
corporation, by an officer; and if made by a public corporation, by its
chief fiscal officer.
[(d)] (e) (1) The Treasurer shall keep a permanent record of all reports
Public Act No. 26-94 8 of 21

Substitute Senate Bill No. 488
submitted to the Treasurer pursuant to this section.
(2) A holder shall retain the following records for at least ten years
after the date any report was filed under this section or the last date a
timely report was due to be filed, unless a shorter retention period is
provided by the Treasurer: (A) The information required to be included
in the report, (B) the date, place and nature of the circumstances that
gave rise to the property right, and (C) any documentation concerning
items considered for reporting that were not ultimately determined to
represent unclaimed property, for verification of whether the holder has
complied with its reporting obligation under this section.
[(e)] (f) Except for claims paid under section 3-67a and except as
provided in subsection (e) of section 3-70a, as amended by this act, no
owner shall be entitled to any interest, income or other increment which
may accrue to property presumed abandoned from and after the date of
payment or delivery to the Treasurer.
[(f)] (g) The Treasurer may decline to receive any property the value
of which is less than the cost of giving notice or holding sale, or may
postpone taking possession until a sufficient sum accumulates.
[(g)] (h) The Treasurer, or any officer or agency designated by the
Treasurer, may examine any person on oath or affirmation, or the
records of any person or any agent of the person including, but not
limited to, a dividend disbursement agent or transfer agent of a business
association, banking organization or insurance company that is the
holder of property presumed abandoned to determine whether the
person or agent has complied with this part. The Treasurer may conduct
the examination even if the person or agent believes the person or agent
is not in possession of any property that must be paid, delivered or
reported under this part. The Treasurer may bring an action in a court
of appropriate jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of this part.
Public Act No. 26-94 9 of 21

Substitute Senate Bill No. 488
[(h)] (i) A record of the issuance of a check, draft or similar instrument
is prima facie evidence of the obligation represented by the check, draft
or similar instrument. In claiming property from a holder who is also
the issuer, the Treasurer's burden of proof as to the existence and
amount of the property and its abandonment is satisfied by showing
issuance of the instrument and passage of the requisite period of
abandonment. Defenses of payment, satisfaction, discharge and want of
consideration are affirmative defenses that shall be established by the
holder.
[(i)] (j) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this
section, the holder of personal property presumed abandoned pursuant
to subdivision (5) of subsection (a) of section 3-57a or section 3-57b shall
(1) sell such property and pay the proceeds arising from such sale,
excluding any charges that may lawfully be withheld, to the Treasurer,
unless such property consists of military medals, in which case such
property shall not be sold, and (2) provide the Treasurer with records
deemed appropriate by the Treasurer of property so presumed
abandoned. The holder shall complete the sale of such property and
deliver the net proceeds to the Treasurer not later than thirty days after
filing the report required under subsection (b) of this section. A holder
of tangible, personal property may contract with a third party to store
and sell such property and to pay the proceeds arising from such sale,
excluding any charges that may be lawfully withheld, to the Treasurer,
provided the third party holds a surety bond or other form of insurance
coverage with respect to such activities. Any holder who sells property
pursuant to subsection (a) of section 3-57a or section 3-57b and remits
the excess proceeds to the Treasurer or who transmits tangible, personal
property to a bonded or insured third party for such purposes, shall not
be responsible for any claims related to the sale or transmission of the
property or proceeds to the Treasurer. If the Treasurer exempts any such
property from being remitted or sold pursuant to this subsection,
whether by regulations or guidelines, the holder of such property may
Public Act No. 26-94 10 of 21

Substitute Senate Bill No. 488
dispose of such property in any manner such holder deems appropriate
and such holder shall not be responsible for any claims related to the
disposition of such property or any claims to the property itself. For
purposes of the sale of personal property presumed abandoned under
subdivision (5) of subsection (a) of section 3-57a or section 3-57b, charges
that may lawfully be withheld include costs of storage, appraisal,
advertising and sales commissions as well as lawful charges owing
under the contract governing the safe deposit box rental.
[(j)] (k) In the event military medals are presumed abandoned
pursuant to subdivision (5) of subsection (a) of section 3-57a, a banking
or financial organization shall transmit such medals to the Department
of Veterans Affairs in accordance with procedures established by the
Treasurer. The Treasurer and Commissioner of Veterans Affairs shall
enter into a memorandum of understanding concerning the handling of
such medals and the Department of Veterans Affairs shall hold such
medals in custody pursuant to such memorandum. The Treasurer may
make any information obtained pursuant to this section, including any
photograph or other visual depiction of a military medal but excluding
Social Security numbers, available to the public to facilitate the
identification of the original owner of such medal or such owner's heirs
or beneficiaries.
Sec. 5. Section 3-66a of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes is
amended by adding subsection (d) as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
(NEW) (d) Personal information of owners contained in the records
of the Treasurer, including those derived from holder reports and
records not published on the searchable list required under this section,
shall be exempt from disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act,
as defined in section 1-200. Nothing in this section prohibits disclosure
of such personal information for purposes directly connected with the
administration of this chapter by the Treasurer or the Treasurer's agents,
including disclosure to other government officials while using
Public Act No. 26-94 11 of 21

Substitute Senate Bill No. 488
appropriate confidentiality protections. For purposes of this section,
"personal information" means information that identifies or reasonably
can be used to identify a person, including the name in conjunction with
(1) the Social Security number or other government issued number or
identifier, (2) date of birth, (3) date of death, (4) home or physical
address or other contact information, (5) Internet provider address, (6)
account number, or (7) abandoned property value.
Sec. 6. Section 3-70a of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(a) Any person claiming an interest in property surrendered to the
Treasurer under the provisions of this part may claim such property, or
the proceeds from the sale thereof, at any time thereafter. Any person
claiming an interest in such property shall file a certified claim with the
Treasurer, setting forth the facts upon which such party claims to be
entitled to recover such property. The Treasurer shall prescribe the form
that such a verified claim shall take.
(b) The Treasurer shall consider each claim not later than ninety days
after it is filed. The Treasurer may hold hearings on any claim and may
refer any claim to the Office of the Claims Commissioner, which shall
hold hearings thereon and promptly return the Claims Commissioner's
recommendations for the payment or rejection thereof. The Treasurer
shall deliver the Treasurer's decision in writing on each claim heard,
with a finding of fact and a statement of the reasons for the Treasurer's
decision. Any person aggrieved by a decision of the Treasurer may
appeal therefrom in accordance with the provisions of section 4-183,
except venue for such appeal shall be in the judicial district of New
Britain.
(c) (1) (A) No agreement entered into prior to January 1, 2023, to
locate property shall be valid if: (i) Such agreement is entered into (I)
Public Act No. 26-94 12 of 21

Substitute Senate Bill No. 488
within two years after the date a report of unclaimed property is
required to be filed under section 3-65a, as amended by this act, or (II)
between the date such a report is required to be filed under said section
and the date it is filed under said section, whichever period is longer;
(ii) such agreement is entered into within two years after the date of
posting of the notice required by section 3-66a, as amended by this act;
or (iii) pursuant to such agreement, any person undertakes to locate
property included in a report of unclaimed property that is required to
be filed under section 3-65a, as amended by this act, for a fee or other
compensation exceeding ten per cent of the value of the recoverable
property.
(B) No agreement entered into on or after January 1, 2023, to locate
property shall be valid if: (i) Such agreement is entered into (I) within
two years after the date a report of unclaimed property is required to be
filed under section 3-65a, as amended by this act, or (II) between the date
such a report is required to be filed under said section and the date it is
filed under said section, whichever period is longer; or (ii) pursuant to
such agreement, any person undertakes to locate property included in a
report of unclaimed property that is required to be filed under section
3-65a, as amended by this act, for a fee or other compensation exceeding
ten per cent of the value of the recoverable property.
(2) (A) In addition to the requirements set forth in subparagraph (B)
of subdivision (1) of this subsection, an agreement entered into prior to
January 1, 2025, to locate property shall be valid only if it is in writing,
is signed by the owner and discloses the nature and value of the
property, and the owner's share after the fee or compensation has been
subtracted is clearly stipulated.
(B) In addition to the requirements set forth in subparagraph (B) of
subdivision (1) of this subsection, an agreement entered into on or after
January 1, 2025, to locate property shall be valid only if such agreement
is in writing, is signed by the owner and clearly and conspicuously
Public Act No. 26-94 13 of 21

Substitute Senate Bill No. 488
discloses (i) the nature and value of the property, (ii) the owner's share
after the fee or compensation has been subtracted from such value, and
(iii) that the owner may file a claim directly with the Treasurer at no cost
and the method through which such claim may be filed.
(3) Any solicitation made to locate unclaimed property shall clearly
and conspicuously disclose in a written statement that (A) any
individual may search for and file a claim for such property directly
with the Treasurer at no cost, and (B) the method through which such
claim may be filed.
(4) Any claim for unclaimed property filed with the Treasurer
pursuant to an agreement or solicitation under this subsection, shall
include an unredacted version of any such agreement or solicitation to
permit the Treasurer to determine whether such agreement or
solicitation complies with the requirements of this subsection.
(5) The Treasurer may withhold payment of a claim for unclaimed
property to anyone other than the owner (A) for failure to comply with
the requirements of subdivision (4) of this subsection, or (B) if the
Treasurer determines that the solicitation or agreement to locate
unclaimed property does not comply with any other requirement of this
section.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent an owner
from asserting, at any time, that an agreement to locate or to otherwise
obtain an interest in unclaimed property is based upon excessive or
unjust consideration.
(d) The Treasurer shall pay each claim allowed without deduction for
costs of notices or sale or for service charges. The Treasurer shall notify
the Commissioner of Revenue Services of the payment of claims of five
hundred dollars or more to the domiciliary administrator or executor of
a deceased owner.
Public Act No. 26-94 14 of 21

Substitute Senate Bill No. 488
(e) In the case of any claim allowed under this section for property,
funds or money delivered to the Treasurer pursuant to subdivision (1)
or (2) of subsection (a) of section 3-57a, the Treasurer shall pay such
claim with interest as follows: For each calendar year or portion thereof
that the property, funds or money has been paid or delivered to the
Treasurer, the Treasurer shall pay interest at a rate that is not less than
the deposit index, as determined under section 36a-26, for such year.
Such interest shall accrue from the date of payment or delivery of the
property, funds or money to the Treasurer until the date of payment or
delivery of the property, funds or money to the claimant.
(f) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section,
where the amount of a property reported or transferred to the Treasurer
under this part is at least fifty dollars and less than two thousand five
hundred dollars, the Treasurer shall pay such amount to an individual
if the Treasurer has determined (1) that such individual is the sole owner
of such property, and (2) to the Treasurer's satisfaction, the current
address of such individual.
(g) The Treasurer may make direct payment to one or more claimants,
without such claimant having been granted a decree to transfer personal
property, been issued a current fiduciary certificate, or secured any
other similar document, for any solely owned unclaimed property of a
deceased owner valued at less than five hundred dollars in the
aggregate at the time of the claim, subject to the following conditions:
(1) If no affidavit in lieu of administration or similar petition has been
filed in a Probate Court or more than one year has passed since the last
decree to transfer personal property or any other similar document has
been issued, upon a claimant furnishing a certified claim and a sworn
affidavit under penalty of perjury showing entitlement to such
property. Such affidavit shall be in a form prescribed by the Treasurer
and shall include, at a minimum, (A) the claimant's affirmation that the
claimant is the sole heir, or (B) attestation from all of the other heirs with
Public Act No. 26-94 15 of 21

Substitute Senate Bill No. 488
a valid claim to the property confirming the rightful distribution of the
property under the law.
(2) If a fiduciary of a decedent estate has been appointed by a Probate
Court, but the decedent's estate was closed more than one year prior to
the discovery of the relevant unclaimed property, upon a claimant's
furnishing of a certified claim and a sworn affidavit under penalty of
perjury showing entitlement to such property. Such affidavit shall be in
a form prescribed by the Treasurer and shall include, at a minimum (A)
the claimant's affirmation that the claimant is the previously appointed
fiduciary and that the claimant shall distribute the funds as required by
law; or (B) attestations from any rightful heir or beneficiary consistent
with the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(3) The payment of the amount due under this section shall constitute
a full acquittance and release of the state for the amount paid. Any
claimant paid by the Treasurer in good faith shall be answerable
concerning such payment to anyone prejudiced by an improper
distribution or payment. Except as provided in this subsection, nothing
in this section shall be construed to modify or eliminate any of a
claimant's responsibilities under any other state or federal law,
including, but not limited to, any obligations under title 45a.
(h) In the case of a military medal that escheated pursuant to section
3-65a, as amended by this act, for which more than one person may have
the right to file a claim, the Treasurer may transmit the medal to the
claimant that the Treasurer deems appropriate after the Treasurer has
made a reasonable effort to identify and contact all known potential
rightful owners.
[(h)] (i) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this
section, where the sole owner of the abandoned property is reported as
the office of the Secretary of the State, State Comptroller, Attorney
General or State Treasurer or a department within the executive branch,
Public Act No. 26-94 16 of 21

Substitute Senate Bill No. 488
as listed in section 4-38c, the Treasurer may submit a report to the Office
of Policy and Management identifying the value of each property
escheated and the applicable office or department that is the reported
owner. Unless the Office of Policy and Management directs otherwise,
the property shall escheat to the state, in accordance with this part, three
months following the submission of such report and the Treasurer shall
reclassify such property as property of the state instead of unclaimed
property.
[(i)] (j) The Treasurer may establish a program that permits the owner
of a claim allowed under this section for property, funds or money to
donate such claim in its entirety to a charitable cause. The Treasurer
shall select one or more of the following to be the recipient of donated
payments under this subsection: (1) The organ transplant account
established in section 17b-288, (2) the AIDS research education account
established in section 19a-32a, (3) the endangered species, natural area
preserves and watchable wildlife account established in section 22a-27l,
(4) the breast cancer research and education account established in
section 19a-32b, (5) the safety net services account established in section
17b-112f, (6) the Connecticut Baby Bond Trust established in section 3-
36b, (7) the mental health community investment account established in
section 17a-451g, or (8) the Military Relief Fund established in section
27-100a. An owner's election to donate an allowed claim payment shall
be irrevocable and remittance of the donation shall be considered full
payment of the allowed claim. The Treasurer shall prescribe the form
that such donation election shall take.
Sec. 7. Section 49-60 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) Each jeweler, watchmaker, silversmith or television and radio
service dealer who alters, repairs or does any work on any article of
personal property at the request of the owner or legal possessor of the
property has a lien upon and may retain the possession of the article
Public Act No. 26-94 17 of 21

Substitute Senate Bill No. 488
until the charges for the alteration, repairing or work have been paid.
(b) If the debt remains unpaid for more than six months, any such
jeweler, watchmaker, silversmith or television and radio service dealer
may sell the article at public or private sale, and the proceeds, after first
paying the expense of such sale, shall be applied in payment of the debt,
the balance, if any, to be presumed abandoned and paid [, in trust for
the debtor,] within ten days to the [State] Treasurer in accordance with
the provisions of subsection (c) of this section. No such sale shall be held
until after thirty days' notice to the owner or legal possessor has been
given by registered or certified mail at his last-known address, stating
the time and place of sale. If the owner's or possessor's address is
unknown, or if such registered or certified mail notice is returned,
further notice shall be given by advertising the time and place of the sale
in a newspaper having a substantial circulation in the locality where the
sale is to take place at least thirty days in advance of the sale. No such
article the value of which is more than one hundred dollars, may be sold
as [hereinbefore] provided in this subsection, unless the charges against
the same equal at least one-third the value of the article.
(c) Upon the completion of a sale under this section, such jeweler,
watchmaker, silversmith or television and radio service dealer shall pay
or deliver such property to the Treasurer, pursuant to part III of chapter
32, and file on a form prescribed by the Treasurer, a report of unclaimed
property as provided in section 3-65a, as amended by this act. Any
notice to the owner or legal possessor in accordance with subsection (b)
of this section shall satisfy the notification requirements set forth in
subsection (a) of section 3-65a, as amended by this act.
Sec. 8. Subsection (a) of section 31-310 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(a) (1) For the purposes of this chapter, the average weekly wage shall
Public Act No. 26-94 18 of 21

Substitute Senate Bill No. 488
be ascertained by dividing the total wages received by the injured
employee from the employer in whose service the employee is injured
during the fifty-two calendar weeks immediately preceding the week
during which the employee was injured, by the number of calendar
weeks during which, or any portion of which, the employee was
actually employed by the employer, but, in making the computation,
absence for seven consecutive calendar days, although not in the same
calendar week, shall be considered as absence for a calendar week.
When the employment commenced otherwise than at the beginning of
a calendar week, that calendar week and wages earned during that week
shall be excluded in making the computation. When the period of
employment immediately preceding the injury is computed to be less
than a net period of two calendar weeks, the employee's weekly wage
shall be considered to be equivalent to the average weekly wage
prevailing in the same or similar employment in the same locality at the
date of the injury except that, when the employer has agreed to pay a
certain hourly wage to the employee, the hourly wage so agreed upon
shall be the hourly wage for the injured employee and the employee's
average weekly wage shall be computed by multiplying the hourly
wage by the regular number of hours that is permitted each week in
accordance with the agreement.
(2) For the purpose of determining the amount of compensation to be
paid in the case of a minor under the age of eighteen who has sustained
an injury entitling the employee to compensation for total or partial
incapacity for a period of fifty-two or more weeks, or to specific
indemnity for any injury under the provisions of section 31-308, the
administrative law judge may add fifty per cent to the employee's
average weekly wage, except in the case of a minor under the age of
sixteen, the administrative law judge may add one hundred per cent to
the minor's average weekly wage. When the injured employee is a
trainee or apprentice receiving a subsistence allowance from the United
States because of war service, the allowance shall be added to the injured
Public Act No. 26-94 19 of 21

Substitute Senate Bill No. 488
employee's actual earnings in determining the average weekly wage.
Where the injured employee has worked for more than one employer as
of the date of the injury and the average weekly wage received from the
employer in whose employ the injured employee was injured, as
determined under the provisions of this section, are insufficient to
obtain the maximum weekly compensation rate from the employer
under section 31-309, prevailing as of the date of the injury, the injured
employee's average weekly wages shall be calculated upon the basis of
wages earned from all such employers in the period of concurrent
employment not in excess of fifty-two weeks prior to the date of the
injury, but the employer in whose employ the injury occurred shall be
liable for all medical and hospital costs and a portion of the
compensation rate equal to seventy-five per cent of the average weekly
wage paid by the employer to the injured employee, after such earnings
have been reduced by any deduction for federal or state taxes, or both,
and for the federal Insurance Contribution Act made from such
employee's total wages received from such employer during the period
of calculation of such average weekly wage, but not less than an amount
equal to the minimum compensation rate prevailing as of the date of the
injury. The remaining portion of the applicable compensation rate shall
be paid from the Second Injury Fund upon submission to the Treasurer
by the employer or the employer's insurer of such vouchers and
information as the Treasurer may require.
(3) For purposes of this subsection, the Second Injury Fund shall not
be deemed an employer or an insurer for any claim brought on behalf
of an insolvent insurer and shall be exempt from liability, unless such
claim is brought not later than thirty days after a determination of such
insurer's bankruptcy.
(4) No claim for payment of retroactive benefits may be made to the
Second Injury Fund more than two years from the date on which the
employer or its insurer paid such benefits in accordance with this
Public Act No. 26-94 20 of 21

Substitute Senate Bill No. 488
subsection, but in no event shall such claim for payment of retroactive
benefits cover a period exceeding three years. In cases which involve
concurrent employment and in which there is a claim against a third
party, the injured employee or the employer in whose employ the injury
was sustained or the employer's insurer shall advise the custodian of the
Second Injury Fund if there is a third party claim, and the employee,
employer or employer's insurer shall pursue its subrogation rights as
provided for in section 31-293 and shall include in its claim all
compensation paid by the Second Injury Fund and shall reimburse the
Second Injury Fund for all payments made for compensation in the
event of a recovery against the third party.
Sec. 9. Subsection (b) of section 31-354 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(b) The State Treasurer shall establish within the Second Injury Fund
[three accounts to be known as the operating account, the settlement
account and the finance account which accounts shall be held separate
and apart from each other. The operating account shall cover the costs
and expenses to the state of operating the Second Injury Fund. The
settlement account shall cover actual disbursement of the settled claims
whether by one-time full payments or by payments over a period of
time. The finance account shall contain such funds and be operated in
the manner provided in section 31-354b] such accounts or Short-Term
Investment Funds as necessary to operate the Second Injury Fund.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Public Act No. 26-94 21 of 21